Utah statutes.
55-12-114.   Juvenile compact administrator.

(1)  Pursuant to this compact, the governor is authorized and empowered to designate a compact administrator and who, acting jointly with like administrators of other party states, shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out more effectively the terms of the compact.  The compact administrator shall serve subject to the pleasure of the governor.

(2)  The compact administrator is authorized, empowered and directed to cooperate with all departments, agencies and officers of and in the government of this state and its subdivisions in facilitating the proper administration of the compact or of any supplementary agreement or agreements entered into by this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 155, 2005 General Session

